Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 3.5
COLORADO STUDENT INCENTIVE
GRANT PROGRAM

Section

23-3.5-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that it is the policy of this state, within appropriations available for such purpose, to provide assistance to Colorado in-state students attending institutions of higher education, by utilizing federal and other moneys available for such purpose.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 3.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

"In-state student" means an undergraduate student at an institution of higher education who meets the criteria established by article 7 of this title for classification as an in-state student at a state institution of higher education, but "in-state student" does not include a member of the armed forces of the United States or his dependents who are eligible to obtain in-state tuition status upon moving to Colorado on a permanent change-of-station basis until such individual meets the one-year domicile requirement of section 23-7-102 (5).

"Institution of higher education" means an educational institution operating in this state that:

Admits as regular students only persons having a certification of graduation from a school providing secondary education or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;

Is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association and, in the case of private occupational schools, holds a regular certificate from the private occupational school division in accordance with the provisions of article 64 of this title 23, or is regulated or approved pursuant to any other statute;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree; or

Provides not less than a two-year program which is acceptable for full credit towards such a degree; or

Provides not less than a one-year program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; or

Is a private occupational school providing not less than a six-month program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation;

Was in operation in this state as of January 1, 1999, or has been in operation in this state for a minimum of ten academic years.

The term "institution of higher education" does not include a branch program of an institution of higher education whose principal campus and facilities are located outside this state, unless the institution operating the branch program has received a certificate of approval from the private occupational school division in accordance with the provisions of article 64 of this title 23.

"Nonpublic institution" means an educational institution which receives no support from general fund moneys in support of its operating costs.

"Professional degree in theology" means a certificate signifying a person's graduation from a degree program that is:

Devotional in nature or designed to induce religious faith; and

Offered by an institution as preparation for a career in the clergy.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3)(a)(II) and (3)(a)(III)(D) amended, p. 852, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 86, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(2) amended, p. 60, § 4, effective August 15.

L. 90:

(3)(a)(II) amended, p. 1172, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 99:

IP(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended and (3)(a)(IV) added, p. 74, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2000.

L. 2009:

(3)(b) amended and (5) added, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1823, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

IP, (3)(a)(II), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1205, § 13, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act amending subsection (3)(b) and adding subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.5-103. Grant program authorized - administration.

The general assembly hereby authorizes the commission to establish a grant program for in-state students having financial need, to be administered in accordance with federal law and regulations and guidelines established by the commission.

The commission shall determine, by guideline, the institutions of higher education eligible for participation in the grant program, and each eligible institution of higher education shall recommend in-state students to the commission for receipt of a grant.

Grant program disbursements shall be handled by the institution of higher education, subject to audit and review as provided in section 23-3.5-104.

Upon commencement of participation in the grant program, no participating institution of higher education shall decrease the amount of its own funds spent for student aid below the amount so spent prior to participation in the grant program.

In determining the amount of a grant, the commission shall consider only that portion of an in-state student's financial need which would have existed were the nonpublic institution's tuition no greater than the highest in-state tuition rate charged by a comparable state institution of higher education.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

23-3.5-103.5. Assistance to professional theology students prohibited.

The guidelines established by the commission pursuant to section 23-3.5-103 (1) shall include:

A prohibition against the awarding of any financial assistance pursuant to this article to a student who is pursuing a professional degree in theology; except that the prohibition described in this section shall not apply to financial assistance that is awarded to a student from a federal program, including but not limited to Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1070, as amended; and

A requirement that an institution or nonpublic institution of higher education that seeks to award financial assistance to a student pursuant to this article certify that the student is not pursuing a professional degree in theology.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1824, § 5, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.5-104. Audit and review.

The state auditor or his designee shall audit, in accordance with federal and commission guidelines, the grant program at any participating institution of higher education every other year to review residency determinations, needs analyses, awards, payment procedures, and such other practices as may be necessary to ensure that the grant program is being properly administered, but such audit shall be limited to the administration of the grant program at the participating institution of higher education. The state auditor may accept an audit of the program from an institution not supported in whole or in part by the general fund from the institution's independent auditor. The cost of conducting audits of the program at an institution not supported in whole or in part by the general fund shall be borne by the institution.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 342, § 7, effective March 27.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 30, effective June 1.

23-3.5-105. Determination of eligibility. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1106, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1827, § 12, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.5-106. Determination of invalidity.

A final judicial determination that this article is invalid as applied to any individual institution of higher education or student shall not operate to terminate any grant provided pursuant to this article to any other institution of higher education or student.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1106, § 1, effective July 1.